Hawaii, session 2026, HB1779.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Hawaii's working families face significant economic challenges, including the rising cost of living, inflation, and limited affordable options for basic needs.  Access to nutritious meals is essential for the overall well-being of Hawaii's people. Further, for students, healthy meals are critical to academic success.  However, for some students, school meals may be their only consistent source of food. The legislature further finds that research shows students experiencing food insecurity face a higher risk of stress, depression, and chronic disease.  Additionally, studies have found that free school meal programs lead to improved student performance.  When universal free school meals have been implemented elsewhere, student test scores rose the equivalent of six additional weeks of school, making the program one of the most cost effective and sustainable academic interventions that the State can establish. The legislature additionally finds that Act 139, Session Laws of Hawaii 2025, expands free school meal coverage to students who currently qualify for reduced-price lunch beginning with the 2025-2026 school year and expands coverage to students whose family income is no more than three hundred per cent of the federal poverty level beginning with the 2026-2027 school year.  Despite these gains, however, thousands of students across the islands are still going hungry because of a lack of resources to ensure consistent food security for themselves and their families. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to expand free school meal coverage to all public school students, including public charter school students, beginning in the 2029-2030 school year. SECTION 2.  Chapter 302D, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§302D-     School meals. (a)  Beginning with the 2029-2030 school year, free school meals shall be provided to every student enrolled in a public charter school, regardless of a student's eligibility for participation in a federal school meals program. (b) No student shall be denied a meal solely for failure to pay for the meal. (c)  The commission may adopt rules or policies governing the collection of funds for student meal accounts with a negative fund balance; provided that no rule or policy shall prohibit feeding a student or otherwise conflict with subsection (b). (d) It is the intent of this section not to jeopardize the receipt of any federal aid and to the extent, and only to the extent necessary to effectuate this intent, the governor may modify the strict provisions of this section, but shall promptly report any such modification with the governor's reasons therefore to the next succeeding session of the legislature for review. (e) As used in this section, "school meals" means breakfast and lunch prepared and served by a school cafeteria or a food vendor that is located outside of school grounds, as designated by a public charter school." SECTION 3.  Section 302A-404, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§302A-404  School meals. (a)  School meals shall be made available under the school meals program in every school where the students are required to eat meals at school. (b) Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, students who qualify for reduced-price meals under the National School Lunch Program shall receive free school meals. (c) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, free school meals shall be provided to every student enrolled in a department school whose family income is [not] no more than three hundred per cent of the federal poverty level, regardless of a student's eligibility for participation in the federal school meals program. (d) Beginning with the 2029-2030 school year, free school meals shall be provided to every student enrolled in a department school, regardless of a student's eligibility for participation in a federal school meals program. [(d)] (e)  No student shall be denied a meal solely for failure to pay. [(e)] (f)  The department may adopt rules or policies governing the collection of funds for student meal accounts with a negative fund balance; provided that no rule or policy shall prohibit feeding a student or otherwise conflict with subsection [(d).] (e). [(f)] (g)  It is the intent of this section not to jeopardize the receipt of any federal aid and, only to the extent necessary to effectuate this intent, the governor may modify strict provisions of this section, but shall promptly report any modification with the governor's reasons therefore to the next succeeding session of the legislature for review." SECTION 4.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.